Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2395.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 2, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-249.20, to read: START_STATUTE15-249.20. Arizona school fitness program; school report cards A. The Arizona school fitness program is established in the department of education to recognize public schools that elect to participate in a nationally recognized physical fitness test or event.  The department shall develop guidelines and identify best practices and resources for schools that participate in the program. B. A school that elects to participate in the program established by subsection A of this section may include the Arizona school fitness program designation in the school report card required by section 15-746. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 13, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 13, 2026.